Tennessee statutes. Title 12 Public Property, Printing And Contracts
Part 5

State Construction Projects Liability Act of 1977

12-4-501. Liability of contractor in construction projects.

This part shall be known as the “State Construction Projects Liability Act of 1977.”

Acts 1977, ch. 367, § 1; T.C.A., § 12-452.

12-4-502. Part definitions.

As used in this part, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Acceptance” means notification by an authorized officer or employee of the state that the work completed has been in accordance with the terms and conditions of the state contract;

“State” means the state of Tennessee;

“State construction project” means any construction project for the purpose of erecting, remodeling, altering, repairing, demolishing, or making any additions to any building or buildings, any other type of building and construction work, or any construction project for the purpose of building, rebuilding, locating or relocating or repairing any streets, highways or bridges, wherein any state funds may be appropriated or expended for such building or construction work;

“State contract” means any contractual agreement, written or oral, inclusive of plans and specifications incidental thereto, entered into by any person, firm or corporation with the state for the performance of work on a state construction project; and

“State contractor” means any person, firm or corporation engaged in a state construction project pursuant to a state contract.

Acts 1977, ch. 367, § 2; T.C.A., § 12-452.

12-4-503. Discharge of contractor from liability.

Upon acceptance by the state of a state contractor's work, provided that such state contractor's work is done in accordance with the plans and specifications, such state contractor is discharged from all liability to any party by reason of its lack of ordinary care in the performance of, or failure to perform, such work on such state construction project.

Acts 1977, ch. 367, § 3; T.C.A., § 12-452.